West Virginia, session 2025, SB320.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16-4C-23 of this code, modified by the Department of Health to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 25, 2024, relating to the Department of Health (statewide trauma and emergency care system, 64 CSR 27), is authorized.